Illinois, session 104th, SB3053.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Herptiles-Herps Act is amended by changing 5Section 5-30 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 68/5-30)7    Sec. 5-30. Taking of turtles or bullfrogs; illegal 8devices. 9    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, turtles 10Turtles or bullfrogs may be taken only by methods set forth in 11administrative rule.12    (b) Bullfrog; common snapping turtle; open season. 13        (1) All persons taking bullfrogs shall possess a valid 14    sport fishing license issued under Article 20 of the Fish 15    and Aquatic Life Code and may take bullfrogs only during 16    the open season to be specified by administrative rule. 17        (2) The daily catch limit and total possession limit 18    for all properly licensed persons shall be specified by 19    administrative rule. 20        (3) All persons taking common snapping turtles shall 21    possess a valid sport fishing license issued under Article 22    20 of the Fish and Aquatic Life Code and may take common 23    snapping turtles only during the open season to be   SB3053- 2 -LRB104 19132 TRT 32577 b1    specified by administrative rule. Common snapping turtles 2    (Chelydra serpentina) may be taken only by methods set 3    forth in administrative rule, except in the counties 4    listed in administrative rule where bowfishing for common 5    snapping turtles is not allowed. Notwithstanding any 6    administrative rule to the contrary, common snapping 7    turtles may be taken by live trap, subject to the 8    following conditions: 9            (A) live traps must be checked every 24 hours; 10            (B) live traps must be equipped with flotation 11        equipment, adequate to have at least 2 inches of the 12        containment area above the surface of the water; and13            (C) every live trap must be marked with the 14        owner's name and address or Department of Natural 15        Resources customer number. 16        (4) The daily catch limit and total possession limit 17    for all properly licensed persons shall be specified by 18    administrative rule. 19    (c) (Blank). 20(Source: P.A. 102-315, eff. 1-1-22.)